New York, session 2025-2026, A1507.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 2 131-cc to read as follows: 3 § 131-cc. Shelter allowances. Notwithstanding any other provision of 4 law to the contrary, local social services districts shall pay the shel- 5 ter allowance equal to the actual rent obligation of recipients up to 6 one hundred percent of the current United States department of housing 7 and urban development's fair market rent as of the date of issuance of 8 the shelter allowance to the recipient for the corresponding unit size 9 in the district in which the recipient resides. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 11 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04190-01-5